Maine, session 132, LD662.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §13056-K is enacted to read:
§13056-K. Active Duty Military Transition to Civilian Life Fund and Program
1. Fund established; purpose. The Active Duty Military Transition to Civilian Life
Fund, referred to in this section as "the fund," is established within the department as an
Other Special Revenue Funds account for the purpose of receiving funds for the program.
Page 1 - 132LR1333(03)

2. Program established; purpose. The Active Duty Military Transition to Civilian
Life Program, referred to in this section as "the program," is established within the
department to support organizations in the State conducting outreach and providing support
services to active duty military members and their families who are transitioning to civilian
life.
3. Fund sources; administration. The fund consists of money appropriated or
allocated to the fund or received from public or private sources. Through agreements or
cooperative arrangements, the department may receive, administer and disburse any funds
or contributions from a state or federal agency, person, firm or corporation, either
independently or in conjunction with state funds appropriated or allocated to the fund for
the purposes of this section.
4. Funds held separate; interest credited; nonlapsing. The funds in the fund must
be held separate and apart from all other money, funds and accounts. Interest earned by
the fund must be credited to the fund. Any unexpended balances remaining in the fund at
the end of any fiscal year do not lapse and must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §2430, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2021, c. 181, Pt. A, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §2430, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Uses of fund. As allocated by the Legislature, the fund may be used for:
A. Expenses of the department to administer this chapter;
B. Grants for research regarding cannabis for medical use in accordance with
subsection 5;
C. Grants to organizations in the State conducting outreach and providing support
services to active duty military members and their families who are transitioning to
civilian life. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before
September 30, 2025, and by every September 30th thereafter, the State Controller shall
transfer $200,000 from the fund to the Active Duty Military Transition to Civilian Life
Fund established within the Department of Economic and Community Development
under Title 5, section 13056-K to administer grants issued pursuant to this paragraph;
and
D. Grants to organizations in the State providing housing and support services for
unhoused veterans and their children and for survivors of military sexual trauma.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before September 30, 2025,
and by every September 30th thereafter, the State Controller shall transfer $285,000
from the fund to the Survivors of Military Sexual Trauma Fund under section 3971 to
administer grants issued pursuant to this paragraph.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA c. 1069 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 1069
SURVIVORS OF MILITARY SEXUAL TRAUMA FUND AND PROGRAM
§3971. Survivors of Military Sexual Trauma Fund and Program
Page 2 - 132LR1333(03)

1. Fund established; purpose. The Survivors of Military Sexual Trauma Fund,
referred to in this section as "the fund," is established within the department. The fund may
receive money from any available state, federal or private source. The fund may not lapse
but must be carried forward to carry out the purposes of this section.
2. Program established; purpose. The Survivors of Military Sexual Trauma
Program, referred to in this section as "the program," is established within the department
to assist organizations in the State that provide housing and support services for unhoused
veterans and their children and for survivors of military sexual trauma.
3. Uses of fund. The fund may be used to support the program.
Sec. 5. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
Active Duty Military Transition to Civilian Life Fund N525
Initiative: Provides ongoing allocations to support organizations in the State conducting
outreach and providing support services to active duty military members and their families
who are transitioning to civilian life.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $200,000 $200,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $200,000 $200,000
ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $200,000 $200,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $200,000 $200,000
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Survivors of Military Sexual Trauma Fund N535
Initiative: Provides ongoing allocations to support organizations in the State providing
housing and support services for unhoused veterans and their children and for survivors of
military sexual trauma.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $285,000 $285,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $285,000 $285,000
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 3 - 132LR1333(03)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $285,000 $285,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $285,000 $285,000
SECTION TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $485,000 $485,000
__________ __________
SECTION TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $485,000 $485,000
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 4 - 132LR1333(03)